en: Dark chocolates with coffee
bg: Черен шоколад с кафе
fr: Chocolats noirs au café
hr: Tamne čokolade s kavom
lt: Juodi šokoladai su kava
pt: Chocolates negros com café

en: Dark chocolates with cocoa nibs, dark chocolates with cocoa beans
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Kakaobohnen
es: Chocolates negro con pepitas de cacao
fr: Chocolats noirs aux fèves de cacao
hr: Tamne čokolade s kakaovcima
it: Cioccolato fondente con semi di cacao, cioccolato fondente con fave di cacao
lt: Juodi šokoladai su kakavos pupelėmis
nl: Pure chocola met stukjes

en: Dark chocolates with ginger
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Ingwer
es: Chocolate negro con jengibre
fr: Chocolats noirs au gingembre
hr: Tamne čokolade s đumbirom
it: Cioccolato fondente con zenzero, cioccolato fondente allo zenzero
lt: Juodi šokoladai su imbieru
nl: Pure chocolade met gember

en: Dark chocolate bar with less than 70% cocoa
fr: Chocolat noir à moins de 70% de cacao en tablette, Tablettes de chocolat noir à moins de 70% de cacao
hr: Crna čokolada s manje od 70% kakaa
lt: Juodos šokolado plytelės su mažiau nei 70% kakavos

en: Dark chocolate filled with mint confectionery
fr: Chocolats noirs fourrés à la menthe, Tablettes de chocolat noir fourrés à la menthe
hr: Crna čokolada punjena mentom slastica
lt: Juodi šokoladai su mėtiniais saldainiais

en: Dark chocolate bar with more than 70% cocoa
fr: Chocolat noir en tablette extra dégustation à 70% de cacao minimum
hr: Crna čokolada s više od 70% kakaa
lt: Juodos šokolado plytelės su daugiau nei 70% kakavos

en: Dark chocolate bar filled with praline
fr: Chocolat noir en tablette fourré au praliné, Tablettes de chocolat noir fourré au praliné

en: Dark chocolate bars for cooking, Dark chocolate bar for cooking with more than 40% cocoa
fr: Chocolats noirs pâtissiers en tablette, Chocolat noir pâtissier en tablette à 40% de cacao minimum, Tablettes de chocolat noir pâtissier à 40% de cacao minimum
hr: Tamna čokolada za kuhanje s više od 40% kakaa
lt: Juodos šokolado plytelės kepimui su daugiau nei 40% kakavos, Kepinių šokoladai, Šokoladai kepimui

en: Milk chocolate bars for cooking
fr: Chocolats au lait pâtissiers en tablette

en: Salted chocolates
de: Gesalzene Schokolade
es: Chocolates con sal
fi: suolaiset suklaat
fr: Chocolats salés
hr: Slane čokolade
it: Cioccolato salato
lt: Šokoladai su druska
nl: Gezouten chocola

en: Salted dark chocolates
de: Gesalzene dunkle Schokolade
es: Chocolates negro con sal
fi: Suolaiset tummat suklaat
fr: Chocolats noirs salés
hr: Slane tamne čokolade
it: Cioccolato fondente salato
lt: Juodi šokoladai su druska
nl: Pure chocola met zout

en: Salted milk chocolates
de: Gesalzene Milchschokoladen
fi: suolaiset maitosuklaat
fr: Chocolats au lait salés
hr: Slane mliječne čokolade
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su druska
nl: Melkchocolade met zout

en: Fleur de sel chocolates
de: Schokoladen mit Fleur de Sel
fr: Chocolats à la fleur de sel
hr: Fleur de sel čokolade
nl: Chocola met fleur de sel

en: Dark chocolates with fleur de sel
de: Dunkle Schokolade mit Fleur de Sel
fr: Chocolats noirs à la fleur de sel
hr: Tamne čokolade s fleur de sel
nl: Pure chocola met fleur de sel

en: Milk chocolates with fleur de sel
de: Milchschokolade mit Fleur de Sel
fr: Chocolats au lait à la fleur de sel
hr: Mliječne čokolade s fleur de sel
nl: Melkchocolade met fleur de sel

en: Caramel chocolates
de: Karamel-Schokoladen
fi: toffeesuklaat
fr: Chocolats au caramel
hr: Karamel čokolade
it: Cioccolato con caramello
lt: Karameliniai šokoladai
nl: Chocola met caramel
pt: Chocolates com caramelo

en: Dark chocolate with caramel
de: Dunkle Schokoladen mit Karamel
fr: Chocolats noirs au caramel
hr: Tamna čokolada s karamelom
it: Cioccolato fondente con caramello
lt: Juosi šokoladai su karamele
nl: Pure chocola met caramel

en: Milk chocolate with caramel
de: Milchschokolade mit Karamel
fi: Maitosuklaata kinuskilla
fr: Chocolats au lait au caramel
hr: Mliječna čokolada s karamelom
it: Cioccolato al latte con caramello
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su karamele
nl: Melkchocolade met caramel

en: Swiss chocolates, Swiss chocolate
de: Schweizer Schokoladen
fi: sveitsiläiset suklaat
fr: Chocolats suisses, chocolat suisse, chocolats de Suisse, chocolat de Suisse
hr: Švicarske čokolade
it: Cioccolato svizzero
ja: スイスチョコレート
lt: Šveicariški šokoladai
nl: Zwitserse chocolades
zh: 瑞士巧克力

en: Chocolate molds
de: Schokoladenformteile
fi: Suklaahahmot
fr: Moulages en chocolat, moulages de chocolat
hr: Kalupi za čokoladu
it: Forme di cioccolato
ja: 象ったチョコレート
lt: Šokoladinės formelės
nl: Chocolade traktaties